Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 17 College Credit Retention

History.

2021 ch. 146, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 146, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.

§ 21-16-1701.
Presumption relating to previously taken courses; hearing.

Any Wyoming institution of higher education receiving funding from the state of Wyoming shall accept as valid and transferrable any college level credit hour previously completed with an acceptable grade in any other Wyoming institution of higher education. An institution of higher education may decline to accept a credit hour only if there is a lack of demonstrable applicability to the current educational standards of the institution. The length of time since completion of the credit hour, without more, shall not demonstrate a lack of applicability. Each institution of higher education shall establish appropriate policies to implement this section, which shall include an appeals process available to persons who are denied acceptance of a college level credit hour.

History.

2021 ch. 146, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2021, ch. 146, § 2, makes the act effective July 1, 2021.